Mississippi statutes. Title 43. Public Welfare
Child Support Unit
§ 43-19-45.
State parent locator service; cooperation of state agencies and the like with Child Support Unit; confidentiality of records; authority to request employment verification, address and social security number of absent or nonsupporting parent or alleged parent; confidentiality of records; penalties [Repealed effective July 1, 2023].

The Child Support Unit shall establish a state parent locator service for the purpose of locating absent and nonsupporting parents and alleged parents, which will utilize all appropriate public and private locator sources. In order to carry out the responsibilities imposed under Sections 43-19-31 through 43-19-53, the Child Support Unit may secure, by administrative subpoena from the customer records of public utilities and cable television companies, the names and addresses of individuals and the names and addresses of employers of such individuals that would enable the location of parents or alleged parents who have a duty to provide support and maintenance for their children. The Child Support Unit may also administratively subpoena any and all financial information, including account numbers, names and social security numbers of record for assets, accounts, and account balances from any individual, financial institution, business or other entity, public or private, needed to establish, modify or enforce a support order. No entity complying with an administrative subpoena to supply the requested information of whatever nature shall be liable in any civil action or proceeding on account of such compliance. Full faith and credit shall be given to all uniform administrative subpoenas issued by other state child support units. The recipient of an administrative subpoena shall supply the Child Support Unit, other state and federal IV-D agencies, its attorneys, investigators, probation officers, county or district attorneys in this state, all information relative to the location, employment, employment-related benefits including, but not limited to, availability of medical insurance, income and property of such parents and alleged parents and with all information on hand relative to the location and prosecution of any person who has, by means of a false statement or misrepresentation or by impersonation or other fraudulent device, obtained Temporary Assistance for Needy Families (TANF) to which he or she was not entitled, notwithstanding any provision of law making such information confidential. The Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services and any other agency in this state using the facilities of the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services are directed to permit the Child Support Unit access to their files, inclusive of those maintained for other state agencies, for the purpose of locating absent and nonsupporting parents and alleged parents, except to the extent that any such access would violate any valid federal statute or regulation issued pursuant thereto. The Child Support Unit, other state and federal IV-D agencies, its attorneys, investigators, probation officers, or county or district attorneys, shall use such information only for the purpose of investigating or enforcing the support liability of such absent parents or alleged parents or for the prosecution of other persons mentioned herein. Neither the Child Support Unit nor those authorities shall use the information, or disclose it, for any other purpose. All records maintained pursuant to the provisions of Sections 43-19-31 through 43-19-53 shall be confidential and shall be available only to the Child Support Unit, other state and federal IV-D agencies, the attorneys, investigators and other staff employed or under contract under Sections 43-19-31 through 43-19-53, district or county attorneys, probation departments, child support units in other states, and courts having jurisdiction in paternity, support or abandonment proceedings. The Child Support Unit may release to the public the name, photo, last-known address, arrearage amount and other necessary information of a parent who has a judgment against him for child support and is currently in arrears in the payment of this support. Such release may be included in a “Most Wanted List” or other media in order to solicit assistance.

The Child Support Unit shall have the authority to secure information from the records of the Mississippi Department of Employment Security that may be necessary to locate absent and nonsupporting parents and alleged parents under the provisions of Sections 43-19-31 through 43-19-53. Upon request of the Child Support Unit, all departments, boards, bureaus and agencies of the state shall provide to the Child Support Unit verification of employment or payment and the address and social security number of any person designated as an absent or nonsupporting parent or alleged parent. In addition, upon request of the Child Support Unit, the Mississippi Department of Employment Security, or any private employer or payor of any income to a person designated as an absent or nonsupporting parent or alleged parent, shall provide to the Child Support Unit verification of employment or payment and the address and social security number of the person so designated. Full faith and credit shall be given to such notices issued by child support units in other states. All such records and information shall be confidential and shall not be used for any purposes other than those specified by Sections 43-19-31 through 43-19-53. The violation of the provisions of this subsection shall be unlawful and any person convicted of violating the provisions of this subsection shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall pay a fine of not more than Two Hundred Dollars ($200.00).

Federal and state IV-D agencies shall have access to the state parent locator service and any system used by the Child Support Unit to locate an individual for purposes relating to motor vehicles or law enforcement. No employer or other source of income who complies with this section shall be liable in any civil action or proceeding brought by the obligor or obligee on account of such compliance.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1976, ch. 483, § 8; Laws, 1988, ch. 345; Laws, 1990, ch. 543, § 1; Laws, 1993, ch. 333, § 1; Laws, 1993, ch. 525, § 1; Laws, 1997, ch. 588, § 13; Laws, 2000, ch. 530, § 2; Laws, 2004, ch. 572, § 50; reenacted without change, Laws, 2008, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 30, § 50; reenacted without change, Laws, 2010, ch. 559, § 50; reenacted without change, Laws, 2011, ch. 471, § 51; reenacted and amended, Laws, 2012, ch. 515, § 51, eff from and after July 1, 2012; reenacted without change, Laws, 2019, ch. 451, § 50, eff from and after passage (approved April 3, 2019).

§ 43-19-46.
Report by employer to Directory of New Hires [Repealed effective July 1, 2023].

Each employer paying wages, salary or commission and doing business in Mississippi shall report to the Directory of New Hires within the Mississippi Department of Human Services:

The hiring of any person who resides or works in this state to whom the employer anticipates paying wages, salary or commission; and

The hiring or return to work of any employee who was laid off, furloughed, separated, granted leave without pay or was terminated from employment.

Employers shall report, by mailing or by other means authorized by the Department of Human Services, a copy of the employee’s W-4 form or its equivalent that will result in timely reporting. Each employer shall submit reports within fifteen (15) days of the hiring, rehiring or return to work of the employee. The report shall contain:

The employee’s name, address, social security number and the date of birth;

The employer’s name, address, and federal and state withholding tax identification numbers; and

The date upon which the employee began or resumed employment, or is scheduled to begin or otherwise resume employment.

The department shall retain the information, which shall be forwarded to the federal registry of new hires.

The Department of Human Services may operate the program, may enter into a mutual agreement with the Mississippi Department of Employment Security or the Department of Revenue, or both, for the operation of the Directory of New Hires Program, or the Department of Human Services may contract for that service, in which case the department shall maintain administrative control of the program.

In cases in which an employer fails to report information, as required by this section, an administratively levied civil penalty in an amount not to exceed Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) shall apply if the failure is the result of a conspiracy between the employer and employee to not supply the required report or to supply a false or incomplete report. The penalty shall otherwise not exceed Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00). Appeal shall be as provided in Section 43-19-58.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1997, ch. 588, § 4; Laws, 2004, ch. 572, § 51; Laws, 2007, ch. 336, § 1; reenacted without change, Laws, 2008, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 30, § 51; Laws, 2011, ch. 471, § 52; Laws, 2011, ch. 530, § 9, eff from and after July 1, 2011; reenacted without change, Laws, 2019, ch. 451, § 51, eff from and after passage (approved April 3, 2019).

§ 43-19-47.
Employment by child support unit of staff attorneys.

The Child Support Unit of the State Department of Human Services, in cooperation with the Attorney General, may appoint at least one (1) full-time staff attorney in or for each chancery court district for the purpose of initiating proceedings under the provisions of Sections 43-19-31 through 43-19-53 in securing child support and establishing paternity. The annual salary of each of the attorneys appointed by the Child Support Unit, in cooperation with the Attorney General’s office under the provisions of Sections 43-19-31 through 43-19-53, shall be fixed at such sums as may be deemed proper in accordance with the salaries of other full-time employed state attorneys with the Attorney General’s Office. Such salaries, inclusive of all reimbursable travel and other expenses, inclusive of financial arrangements perfected with the appropriate courts, the law enforcement officials and the district attorneys, shall be paid monthly from the funds appropriated to the Child Support Unit of the State Department of Human Services and from the special fund for the Division of Child Support in which the interest from its accounts and all attorney’s fees and other fees is placed. The Mississippi Personnel Board shall survey the salaries of other Mississippi attorneys with the Attorney General’s Office each year and shall raise the start step of the staff and senior attorneys accordingly and the minimum shall never go below Forty Thousand Dollars ($40,000.00) for staff attorneys or Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00) for senior attorneys.

To assist in the implementation of the provisions of Sections 43-19-31 through 43-19-53, the Executive Director of the Department of Human Services is empowered to enter into cooperative agreements with district attorneys, county attorneys and attorneys employed by the county boards of supervisors, in conjunction with the Office of Attorney General. Said cooperative agreements shall be made in compliance with the regulations established by the Secretary of the Department of Health and Human Services, and may be funded either by funds appropriated to the Child Support Unit of the State Department of Human Services or funds appropriated by any county board of supervisors in this state for their respective county. Attorneys may be hired contractually to be paid in amounts commensurate with the department’s staff attorneys.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1976, ch. 483, § 9; Laws, 1983, ch. 393, § 5; Laws, 2003, ch. 514, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 19, 2003.).

§ 43-19-48.
Use of data match systems by Department of Human Services for noncustodial parents delinquent in child support payments.

The Department of Human Services and financial institutions doing business in the state are required to enter into agreements:

To develop and operate a data match system, using automated data exchanges, in which each such financial institution is required to provide for each calendar quarter the name, record address, Social Security number or other taxpayer identification number, and other identifying information for each noncustodial parent who maintains an account at such institution and who owes past-due support, as identified by the Department of Human Services by name and Social Security number or other taxpayer identification number;

To encumber or surrender, as the case may be, assets held by such institution on behalf of any noncustodial parent who is subject to a child support lien; and

To provide for payment of reasonable fees to financial institutions for conducting data matches, and for responding to other requests made pursuant to this section, with such fees not to exceed the actual costs incurred by such financial institutions.

When the operation of such data match system results in the location of an account of a noncustodial parent who owes past-due support, or when such account is located through any means, the department may request and shall receive additional financial or other information including account numbers, names and Social Security numbers on record for accounts, and account balances, from any financial institution needed to establish, modify or enforce a support order.

The department shall have the authority to encumber and seize assets held by an obligor in a financial institution doing business in Mississippi. Such assets shall be encumbered for either:

A forty-five-day period; or

Until such time as the issue of overdue support is resolved, provided the obligor has filed a petition for hearing with a court of appropriate jurisdiction and the financial institution receives written notice thereof from the department before the end of the said forty-five-day period.

Notice of such encumbrance initiated by the department shall be provided to the financial institution and to the obligor:

The department shall send, by certified mail, notice to the financial institution with which the account is placed, directing that the financial institution shall:

Immediately encumber funds in any account(s) in which the obligor has an interest, and to the extent of the debt indicated in the notice from the department;

Forward the encumbered funds to the department after either the forty-five-day period stated in subsection 3(a) of this section, or a determination favorable to the department by a court of appropriate jurisdiction; or

In the event the obligor prevails before the court, immediately release said funds to the obligor.

Notice shall be delivered to the obligor at the current mailing address as recorded by the department. Such notice shall be sent by regular mail at the commencement of the action described herein.

The financial institution shall not disclose to an account holder or the depositor that the name of such person has been received from or furnished to the department. The financial institution shall disclose to its account holders or its depositors that under the data match system the department has the authority to request certain identifying information on the account holders’ or the depositor’s accounts.

Challenges to encumbrance of an account:

Challenges to such levy for child support arrearage may be initiated only by the obligor or by an account holder of interest.

Challenges shall be made by the filing of a petition for hearing by the obligor in a court of appropriate jurisdiction under Rule 81(d)(2) of the Mississippi Rules of Civil Procedure. Service upon the department shall be as prescribed by Rule 4(d)(5) of the Mississippi Rules of Civil Procedure.

Grounds for the petition challenging the encumbrance shall be limited to:

Mistakes of identity; or

Mistakes in amount of overdue support.

Liability of the financial institution and the department:

Neither the department nor the financial institution shall be liable for any applicable early withdrawal penalties on the obligor’s account(s).

A financial institution shall be absolutely immune from any civil liability under any law or regulation to any person for the disclosure of or failure to disclose any information pursuant to this chapter or for the escrow, encumbrance, seizure or surrender of any assets held by the financial institution in response to any notice issued by the Department of Human Services, the Child Support Unit or any contractors or agents thereof unless the disclosure or failure to disclose was willful or intentional, or for any other action taken in good faith to comply with the requirements of this chapter.

Any amount encumbered and forwarded by the financial institution under this section shall not exceed the arrearage owed by the obligor.

The provisions herein and any other relevant sections shall be employed equally by authorized contractors of the department to collect delinquent support payments.

A financial institution shall not be liable under federal or state law to any person:

For any disclosure of information to the Department of Human Services;

For encumbering or forwarding any assets held by such financial institution in response to a notice of lien or levy;

For any other action taken in good faith to comply with the requirements of subsection (1)(a) or (b) above.

Definitions. For purposes of this section:

The term “financial institution” has the meaning given to such by Section 81-12-3, Mississippi Code of 1972, and shall include, but not be limited to, credit unions, stock brokerages, public or private entities administering retirement, savings, annuities, life insurance and/or pension funds;

The term “account” means a demand deposit account, checking or negotiable withdrawal order account, savings account, time deposit account or money-market mutual fund account.

Failure to comply with the provisions of this section or the willful rendering of false information shall subject the financial institution to a fine of not less than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00).

HISTORY:
Laws, 1997, ch. 588, § 137, eff from and after July 1, 1997.

§ 43-19-49.
Employment by child support unit of investigative, technical, secretarial and supportive staff.

There is hereby authorized to be employed by the child support unit of the state department of public welfare such other, investigative, technical, secretarial and supportive staff as may be necessary for the proper and necessary implementation of the requirements of Public Law 93-647, 93rd Congress, and any amendments adopted thereto applicable to said program as provided under Sections 43-19-31 through 43-19-53; said positions shall be subject to the merit system’s rules and regulations and their salaries shall be fixed in such amounts as the state department of public welfare may deem proper.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1976, ch. 483, § 10, eff from and after July 1, 1976.

§ 43-19-51.
Duties, powers and functions of Attorney General’s office, district attorneys and county attorneys unaffected.

Nothing contained in Sections 43-19-31 through 43-19-53 shall be construed as relieving or diminishing any of the duties, powers and functions of the Attorney General’s office, district attorneys or county attorneys under the statutes of this state relating to the collection of any judgment or debt in favor of the state or the enforcement of the criminal laws under Sections 43-19-31 through 43-19-53 or any other provisions of state law.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1976, ch. 483, § 11, eff from and after July 1, 1976.

§ 43-19-53.
Annual report.

Not later than sixty (60) days after the first day of January of each year, the state department of public welfare shall cause to be published for the preceding calendar year a detailed report showing the total number of cases in the aid to dependent children program reported on the basis of fraud or suspected fraud, the total number investigated, prosecuted and disposed of civilly and/or criminally in each county of the state and the total number of support and paternity cases reported, investigated, continued, prosecuted civilly, and the total amount of support collected.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1976, ch. 483, § 12, eff from and after July 1, 1976.

§ 43-19-55.
Authorization to manage bank accounts for funds received as incentives from federal government and as income tax offsets.

The State Department of Human Services shall be authorized in maintaining separate accounts with Mississippi banks to handle funds received as incentives from the federal government earned as a result of collecting support and also any funds maintained on deposit as a result of federal and state income tax offsets and any other relevant account, and to aggressively manage the float in these accounts so as to accrue maximum interest advantage of the funds in the account, and to retain all earned interest on these funds to be applied to defray the expenses of the Child Support Unit.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 323; Laws, 2003, ch. 514, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 19, 2003.).

§ 43-19-57.
Administrative subpoenas.

Any administrative subpoena issued by the Department of Human Services pursuant to the provisions of Laws, 1997, Chapter 588, shall be directed to the appropriate party or entity and signed by the Director of the Department of Human Services or his designee.

A person wishing to appeal the issuance of an administrative subpoena shall have recourse to the chancery courts as for any subpoena.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1997, ch. 588, § 147, eff from and after July 1, 1997.

§ 43-19-58.
Appeals process for imposition of civil penalties.

Persons wishing to contest the imposition of an administrative civil penalty under the provisions of Laws, 1997, Chapter 588, shall be entitled to a hearing before the Director of the Department of Human Services or his designee by so requesting within twenty (20) days after receiving notice of the imposition of the administratively imposed civil penalty. The request shall identify the civil penalty contested and legibly state the contestant’s name, mailing address and home and daytime phone numbers. The date, time and place for the hearing shall be made as convenient as possible for the contestant, who shall receive notice thereof not less than seven (7) days before the hearing. A hearing on whether to impose a civil penalty and to consider circumstances in mitigation shall be held on the time and the place specified in the notice. The contestant may appear in person, through his attorney or, prior to the date set for the hearing, submit written testimony and other evidence, subject to the penalty for false swearing, for entry in the hearing record.

After the hearing, the director or his designee shall issue his order, which may be appealed to the chancery court of the county in which the contestant resides in the same manner as is provided by law for appeals originating from county courts.

The director or his designee may file the order assessing the penalty, or a certified copy of the order, with the clerk of any chancery court in the state after expiration of the time in which an appeal may be taken, or final determination of the matter on appeal, whereupon the order assessing the penalty shall be enrolled on the judgment roll and may be enforced in the same manner as a judgment.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1997, ch. 588, § 148, eff from and after July 1, 1997.

§ 43-19-59.
Child Support Unit to use high-volume automated administrative enforcement to enforce out-of-state support orders.

The Department of Human Services, as the Title IV-D child support enforcement agency of this state, shall use high-volume automated administrative enforcement, to the same extent as used for intrastate cases, in response to a request made by another state to enforce support orders, and shall promptly report the results of such enforcement procedure to the requesting state.

In this section, “high-volume, automated administrative enforcement” means the use of automatic data processing to search various available state data bases, including, but not limited to, license records, employment service data, and state new hire registries, to determine whether information is available regarding a parent who owes a child support obligation.

The department may, by electronic or other means, transmit to another state or receive from another state a request for assistance in enforcing support orders through high-volume, automated administrative enforcement, which request:

Shall include such information as will enable the state to which the request is transmitted to compare the information about the cases to the information in the data bases of the state receiving the request; and

Shall constitute a certification by the requesting state:

Of the amount of support under an order the payment of which is in arrears; and

That the requesting state has complied with all procedural due process requirements applicable to each case.

If the department provides assistance to another state with respect to a case, or if another state seeks assistance from the department pursuant to this section, neither state shall consider the case to be transferred to the caseload of such other state.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1999, ch. 512, § 19, eff from and after July 1, 1999.

§ 43-19-61.
Child Support Prosecution Fund created; purpose; funding of expenses of legal division of Child Support Unit; deposit of user charges and fees authorized under this section into State General Fund.

There is created in the State Treasury a special fund to be designated as the “Child Support Prosecution Fund.” The fund shall be used by the Office of the Attorney General for the prosecution of delinquent child support cases and may also be used to draw down the sixty-six percent (66%) federal reimbursement IV-D funds for support of the Legal Division of the Child Support Unit of the Mississippi Department of Human Services.

From and after July 1, 2016, the expenses of the legal division of the Child Support Unit shall be defrayed by appropriation from the State General Fund and all user charges and fees authorized under this section shall be deposited into the State General Fund as authorized by law and as determined by the State Fiscal Officer.

From and after July 1, 2016, no state agency shall charge another state agency a fee, assessment, rent or other charge for services or resources received by authority of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2005, 2nd Ex Sess, ch. 1, § 3 eff from and after July 1, 2005; Laws, 1st Ex Sess, 2017, ch. 7, § 21, eff from and after passage (approved June 23, 2017).